Maryland, session 2025, HB0949.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–522.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “QUALIFIED DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0949*

HOUSE BILL 949
(3) “QUALIFIED DATA CENTER PERSONAL PROPERTY” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) THE GOVERNING BODY OF CALVERT COUNTY MAY ENTER INTO AN
AGREEMENT WITH THE OWNER OF A QUALIFIED DATA CENTER THAT IS LOCATED OR
LOCATES IN THE COUNTY FOR A NEGOTIATED PAYMENT BY THE OWNER IN LIEU OF
COUNTY PROPERTY TAXES.
(C) AN AGREEMENT FOR A NEGOTIATED PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE THAT, FOR THE TERM SPECIFIED IN THE
AGREEMENT:
(1) THE OWNER SHALL PAY TO THE COUNTY A SPECIFIED AMOUNT
EACH YEAR IN LIEU OF THE PAYMENT OF COUNTY REAL, OPERATING REAL,
OPERATING PERSONAL, OR QUALIFIED DATA CENTER PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX;
AND
(2) ALL OR A SPECIFIED PART OF THE REAL, OPERATING REAL,
OPERATING PERSONAL, OR QUALIFIED DATA CENTER PERSONAL PROPERTY AT THE
QUALIFIED DATA CENTER SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM COUNTY PROPERTY TAX FOR THE
TERM OF THE AGREEMENT.
(D) AS SPECIFIED IN AN AGREEMENT FOR A NEGOTIATED PAYMENT IN LIEU
OF TAXES UNDER THIS SECTION, FOR THE TERM SPECIFIED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE
REAL, OPERATING REAL, OPERATING PERSONAL, OR QUALIFIED DATA CENTER
PERSONAL PROPERTY AT A QUALIFIED DATA CENTER THAT IS LOCATED OR LOCATES
IN THE COUNTY IS EXEMPT FROM COUNTY PROPERTY TAX.
(E) ON THE WRITTEN REQUEST OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF CALVERT
COUNTY, THE SUPERVISOR SHALL ASSESS THE REAL, OPERATING REAL, OPERATING
PERSONAL, OR QUALIFIED DATA CENTER PERSONAL PROPERTY OF THE OWNER OF
A QUALIFIED DATA CENTER WITH WHOM THE COUNTY HAS ENTERED INTO A
PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES AGREEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.